Massachusetts, session 194th, S3118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the Groton-Dunstable regional school district agreement,
section 16A of chapter 71 of the General Laws, or any other general or special law to the
contrary, the vacancy in one of the two Dunstable seats on the Groton-Dunstable regional school
district committee following the 2026 Dunstable annual town election may be filled by the
Dunstable select board and the remaining Dunstable member of the Groton-Dunstable regional
school district committee, acting jointly by majority vote, by appointing a member to serve a
three-year term until the 2029 Dunstable annual town election.
of 1